test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lassa_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - lássá: # á-stems
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom: lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen: lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc: lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill: lááṣán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc: lááṣást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com: lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe: láṣáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess: lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom: lááṣáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: lááṣái
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc: lááṣáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill: lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc: lááṣáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com: láṣáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe: láṣáittáá
